Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 1

Hiking-Bicycle Trails

11-12-101. Feasibility studies.

Whenever the state or a political subdivision thereof owns or regulates a right-of-way it is considering abandoning, such political entity shall conduct a study to determine the feasibility of converting such right-of-way into a hiking-bicycle trail.

The results of the study shall be reduced to writing, shall explain the reasoning underlying all conclusions reached and shall be made available for public inspection.

Acts 1965, ch. 181, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-2001.

11-12-102. Applicability.

This part only applies in those counties with a metropolitan form of government and in those counties with a population according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census of:

not less than nor more than

11,650 11,675

23,460 23,485

35,450 35,475

50,675 50,700

250,000 300,000

Acts 1978, ch. 903, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-2001.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.